Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5640.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-15-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-15 entitled "Passing, Use
of Lanes, and Rules of the Road" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-15-9. One way highways.
(a) The state traffic commission may designate any highway or any separate roadway under
its jurisdiction for one-way traffic and shall erect appropriate signs giving notice of one-way traffic.
(b) Upon a roadway designated and signposted for one-way traffic a vehicle shall be driven
only in the direction designated. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in § 31-
41.1-4.
(c) Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in § 31-41.1-4 If a motorist
violates this section on an interstate highway or on an entrance or exit ramp connected to an
interstate highway, the motorist may be subject to a fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500) or
license suspension of up to six (6) months, or both.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001498
========